Mississippi, session 2026, HB636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-6-155, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-6-155.  (1)  Any blind person, mobility impaired person, armed services veteran diagnosed with PTSD or hearing impaired person who uses a support animal specifically trained as a guide, leader, listener or for any other necessary assistance in day-to-day activities shall be entitled to the full and equal accommodations, advantages, facilities and privileges of all public conveyances, hotels, lodging places, businesses open to the public for the sale of any goods or services and all places of public accommodation, amusement, or resort and other places to which the general public is invited, and may take the support animal into conveyances and places, subject only to the conditions and limitations applicable to all persons not so accompanied and such conditions or restrictions are clearly posted in a manner that allows them to be seen and read before entry, except that: (a)  The support animal shall not occupy a seat in any public conveyance. (b)  The support animal shall be upon a leash or otherwise sufficiently restrained in a manner appropriate for the animal while using the facilities of a common carrier. (2)  Support animal trainers shall have the same rights of accommodations, advantages, facilities and privileges with support animals-in-training as those provided to blind persons, mobility impaired persons, hearing impaired persons or veterans diagnosed with PTSD with support animals under this section. (3)  No person shall deprive a blind person, mobility impaired person, hearing impaired person, veteran diagnosed with PTSD or a support animal trainer of any of the advantages, facilities or privileges provided in this section, nor charge such blind person, mobility impaired person, hearing impaired person, veteran diagnosed with PTSD or support animal trainer a fee or charge for the use of the animal. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.